Utah statutes.
16-6a-108.   Effective time and date of filed documents.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and Subsection 16-6a-109(4), a
document submitted to the division for filing under this chapter is effective:
(i)  at the time of filing; and
(ii)  on the date it is filed.
(b)  The division's endorsement on the document as described in Subsection
16-6a-110(2) is evidence of the time and date of filing.
(2) (a)  Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, a document, other than an
application for a reserved or registered name, may specify conspicuously on
its face:
(i)  a delayed effective time;
(ii)  a delayed effective date; or
(iii)  both a delayed effective time and date.
(b)  If in accordance with Subsection (2)(a), a delayed time, date, or both,
is specified, the document becomes effective as provided in this Subsection
(2).
(c)  If both a delayed effective time and date are specified, the document
becomes effective as specified.
(d)  If a delayed effective time but no date is specified, the document is
effective on the date it is filed, as that date is specified in the division's
time and date endorsement on the document, at the later of:
(i)  the time specified on the document as its effective time; or
(ii)  the time specified in the time and date endorsement.
(e)  If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is
effective at the close of business on the date specified as the delayed
effective date.
(f)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Subsection (2), a delayed
effective date for a document may not be later than 90 days after the date the
document is filed.  If a document specifies a delayed effective date that is
more than 90 days after the date the document is filed, the document is
effective 90 days after the day the document is filed.
(3)  If a document specifies a delayed effective date pursuant to Subsection
(2), the document may be prevented from becoming effective by the same
domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation that originally submitted the
document for filing delivering to the division, prior to the specified
effective date of the document, a certificate of withdrawal:
(a)  executed:
(i)  on behalf of the same domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation that
originally submitted the document for filing; and
(ii)  in the same manner as the document being withdrawn;
(b)  stating that:
(i)  the document has been revoked by:
(A)  appropriate corporate action; or
(B)  court order or decree pursuant to Section 16-6a-1007; and
(ii)  the document is void; and
(c)  if a court order or decree pursuant to Section 16-6a-1007 revokes the
document, the court order or decree was entered by a court having jurisdiction
of the proceeding for the reorganization of the nonprofit corporation under a
specified statute of the United States.
